New York, session 2025-2026, A6106.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 7 of section 2510 of the public health law, as 2 amended by section 1 of part DDD of chapter 56 of the laws of 2022, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 7. "Covered health care services" means: the services of physicians, 5 optometrists, nurses, nurse practitioners, midwives and other related 6 professional personnel which are provided on an outpatient basis, 7 including routine well-child visits; diagnosis and treatment of illness 8 and injury; inpatient health care services; laboratory tests; diagnostic 9 x-rays; prescription and non-prescription drugs, ostomy and other 10 medical supplies and durable medical equipment; radiation therapy; 11 chemotherapy; hemodialysis; outpatient blood clotting factor products 12 and other treatments and services furnished in connection with the care 13 of hemophilia and other blood clotting protein deficiencies; emergency 14 room services; air ambulance services; ambulance services; hospice 15 services; emergency, preventive and routine dental care, including 16 orthodontia but excluding cosmetic surgery; emergency, preventive and 17 routine vision care, including eyeglasses; speech and hearing services; 18 inpatient and outpatient mental health, alcohol and substance abuse 19 services, including children and family treatment and support services, 20 children's home and community based services, assertive community treat- 21 ment services and residential rehabilitation for youth services which 22 shall be reimbursed in accordance with the ambulatory patient group 23 (APG) rate-setting methodology as utilized by the department of health, 24 the office of addiction services and supports, or the office of mental 25 health for rate-setting purposes or any such other fees established EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08593-01-5 A. 6106 2 1 pursuant to article forty-three of the mental hygiene law; and health- 2 related services provided by voluntary foster care agency health facili- 3 ties licensed pursuant to article twenty-nine-I of this chapter; as 4 defined by the commissioner. "Covered health care services" shall not 5 include drugs, procedures and supplies for the treatment of erectile 6 dysfunction when provided to, or prescribed for use by, a person who is 7 required to register as a sex offender pursuant to article six-C of the 8 correction law, provided that any denial of coverage of such drugs, 9 procedures or supplies shall provide the patient with the means of 10 obtaining additional information concerning both the denial and the 11 means of challenging such denial. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.